Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 1 Financial Disclosure
2-10-118. Filing by responsible party with prior assessment record.

It is unlawful for a responsible party of a multicandidate political campaign committee who has a prior assessment record to intentionally fail to file a required report under this chapter, for which the party is responsible for filing, within thirty-five (35) days after service of process or receipt of notice from the registry by registered or certified mail. For the purposes of this section, “responsible party” is the treasurer of the committee appointed pursuant to § 2-10-105(e), or if no treasurer has been appointed, any person who organizes or directs the fundraising activities of a multicandidate political campaign committee. A responsible party shall be considered to have a prior assessment record for purposes of this section if during the person's service as a responsible party to one (1) or more multicandidate political campaign committees, the committee or committees violate on two (2) or more occasions § 2-10-110 or § 2-10-308 and such violations result in the committee or committees being assessed a penalty by the registry.

A violation of this section is a Class E felony.

Acts 1997, ch. 399, § 1.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

2-10-119. Transfer of funds or assets from federal to state election campaign committee prohibited.

Transfers of funds or assets from a candidate's campaign committee or account for a federal election to a political campaign committee of or for such candidate for public office in this state is prohibited.

Acts 2000, ch. 612, § 1.

Cross-References. Campaign funds, allocation of unexpended contributions, use of funds, specifically prohibited uses of funds, allocation of funds on death of incumbent or candidate, §2-10-114.

2-10-120. Authority of county election commission.

The county election commission has the authority to forward information regarding violation of disclosure laws by candidates for local public office to the district attorney general for investigation without the necessity of a sworn complaint from a registered voter as provided by §2-10-108.

Acts 2000, ch. 756, § 19.

2-10-121. Registration fee for political campaign committees.

No later than January 31 of each year, each multicandidate political campaign committee registered with the registry of election finance shall pay a registration fee to be determined by rule promulgated pursuant to §4-55-103(1). Payment of the registration fee by one (1) affiliated political campaign committee includes any disclosed affiliated committees registering separately; payment of the registration fee by a statewide political party, as defined in §2-1-104, includes any disclosed subsidiaries of the political party registering separately. For any multicandidate political campaign committee registering a new committee during any year, the committee shall pay the appropriate registration fee at the time that it certifies its political treasurer. All fees collected under this section shall be retained and used for expenses related to maintaining an electronic filing system.

Acts 2003, ch. 414, § 2; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 9; 2009, ch. 556, § 6; 2019, ch. 77, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added the second sentence, and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “This section shall not apply to any statewide political party as defined in §2-1-104 or subsidiaries of the political party.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 77, § 2. April 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Bureau of ethics and campaign finance, title 4, ch. 55.

2-10-122. Definitions for §§ 2-10-122 — 2-10-128.

As used in this section and §§2-10-123 —2-10-128, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Consulting services” with respect to an official in the legislative branch or an official in the executive branch means services to advise or assist a person or entity in influencing legislative or administrative action, as that term is defined in § 3-6-301, relative to Tennessee state government. “Consulting services” with respect to an official in the legislative branch or an official in the executive branch also means services to advise or assist a person or entity in maintaining, applying for, soliciting or entering into a contract with the state of Tennessee. “Consulting services” does not mean the practice or business of law in connection with representation of clients by a licensed attorney in a contested case action, administrative proceeding or rule making procedure;

“Consulting services” with respect to an elected municipal or county official, including a member-elect of a municipal or county legislative body, means services to advise or assist a person or entity in influencing legislative or administrative action, as that term is defined in § 3-6-301, relative to the municipality or county represented by that official. “Consulting services” with respect to an elected municipal or county official, including a member-elect of a municipal or county legislative body, also means services to advise or assist a person or entity in maintaining, applying for, soliciting or entering into a contract with the municipality or county represented by that official. “Consulting services” does not mean the practice or business of law in connection with representation of clients by a licensed attorney in a contested case action, administrative proceeding or rule making procedure;

“Fee, commission, or any other form of compensation” and “compensation” do not include anything of value that may be accepted under § 2-10-116 or that is identified in § 3-6-305(b);

“Official in the executive branch” means the governor, any member of the governor's staff or any person in the executive service as such term is defined in § 8-30-202; provided, however, that “official in the executive branch” shall not include members of boards and commissions who receive only expenses or a nominal per diem not to exceed six hundred dollars ($600) per month, unless they provide consulting services for compensation with respect to the activities of the board or commission of which they are a member; and

“Official in the legislative branch” has the same meaning as the term is defined in § 3-6-301.

Acts 2005, ch. 102, § 1; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 29.

Compiler's Notes. In light of the passage of Acts 2012, ch. 800, which rewrote the civil service provisions, the reference to §8-30-208 was changed to §8-30-202 in (4).

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that act is, and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Attorney General Opinions. Advising and consulting with business clients under the Ethics Act, OAG 05-096 (6/17/05).

Consulting under the Ethics Act of 2005, OAG 05-098 (6/20/05).

Legislator as president of the Tennessee Professional Fire Fighters Association, OAG 05-126 (8/22/05).

Applicability and enforcement of disclosure requirements under the Ethics Act, OAG 06-002 (1/4/06).

Citizen school board member conflicts of interest. OAG 10-46, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 46 (4/12/10).

2-10-123. Violations at state level — Penalties.

It is an offense for any member of the general assembly, member-elect of the general assembly, governor, member of the governor's staff, secretary of state, treasurer, or comptroller of the treasury to knowingly receive a fee, commission or any other form of compensation for consulting services from any person or entity, other than compensation paid by the state, a county or municipality.

It is an offense for any person or other entity, other than the state, a county or a municipality, to pay a fee, commission or any other form of compensation for consulting services to a person such person or entity knows to be a member of the general assembly, member-elect of the general assembly, governor, member of the governor's staff, secretary of state, treasurer, or comptroller of the treasury.

If conduct giving rise to a violation of this section would also constitute the offense of bribery prohibited by § 39-16-102, then such violation is a Class C felony. Any person convicted of such offense shall forever afterwards be disqualified from holding any office under the laws or constitution of this state.

Nothing contained within this section shall be construed to prohibit prosecution and conviction for the Class C felony offense of bribery of a public servant, set forth in § 39-16-102; nor shall it be construed to prohibit prosecution and conviction for any other applicable criminal offense.

Any other violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor. Any person convicted of such offense shall forever afterwards be disqualified from holding any office under the laws or constitution of this state.

Acts 2005, ch. 102, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Penalty for Class C felony, §40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Legislator as president of the Tennessee Professional Fire Fighters Association, OAG 05-126 (8/22/05).

Direct appropriation grant to corporation for which legislator is president, OAG 05-169 (11/3/05).

Conflicts of interest involving state and county election commissions, OAG 06-159 (10/9/06).

Service on the board of the Tellico Reservoir Development Agency by a state representative, OAG 07-036 (3/26/07).

Legislator would not be prohibited from directly participating in efforts to assist his or her employer in obtaining contracts with municipalities and counties and receiving compensation from the employer for those efforts, OAG 08-192 (12/29/08).

2-10-124. Violations at local level — Penalties.

It is an offense for any member of a municipal or county legislative body, member-elect of a municipal or county legislative body, or other elected county or municipal official to knowingly receive a fee, commission or any other form of compensation for consulting services, other than compensation paid by the state, a county, or municipality.

It is an offense for any person or other entity, other than the state, a county, or a municipality, to pay a fee, commission or any other form of compensation for consulting services relating to a municipality or county if such person or entity knows the person to whom the compensation is paid is a member of the municipal or county legislative body, a member-elect of the municipal or county legislative body, or other elected municipal or county official in the county or municipality in which the consulting services are to be performed.

If conduct giving rise to a violation of this section would also constitute the offense of bribery prohibited by § 39-16-102, then such violation is a Class C felony. Any person convicted of such offense shall forever afterwards be disqualified from holding any office under the laws or constitution of this state.

Nothing contained within this section shall be construed to prohibit prosecution and conviction for the Class C felony offense of bribery of a public servant, set forth in § 39-16-102; nor shall it be construed to prohibit prosecution and conviction for any other applicable criminal offense.

Any other violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor. Any person convicted of such offense shall forever afterwards be disqualified from holding any office under the laws or constitution of this state.

Acts 2005, ch. 102, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Penalty for Class C felony, §40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Consulting under the Ethics Act of 2005, OAG 05-098 (6/20/05).

Conflicts of interest involving state and county election commissions, OAG 06-159 (10/9/06).

Citizen school board member conflicts of interest. OAG 10-46, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 46 (4/12/10).

2-10-125. Disclosure of contract for consulting services to the Tennessee ethics commission.

If any person or other entity, other than the state, a county or municipality, contracts to pay a fee, commission or any other form of compensation for consulting services to any staff person or employee of the general assembly; member of a commission established by and responsible to the general assembly or either house of the general assembly; member or employee of a state regulatory commission, including, without limitation, commissioners of the Tennessee public utility commission; or member or employee of any executive department or agency or other state body in the executive branch, then such person or entity shall disclose the following to the Tennessee ethics commission:

The person to whom the fee was paid;

The position of the person to whom the fee was paid;

The amount of the fee;

The date the services were rendered; and

A general description of the services rendered.

The disclosure shall be on a form designed by the Tennessee ethics commission, shall be made under oath, and shall contain a statement that a false statement on the report is subject to the penalties of perjury. A disclosure form shall be filed within five (5) days of entering into any contract for consulting services. Such form shall be updated quarterly. The dates for filing the quarterly reports shall be determined by the Tennessee ethics commission.

All disclosures made to the commission pursuant to this section are public records and open for inspection during regular business hours.

It is a Class C misdemeanor for any person or entity to knowingly fail to file a disclosure form as required by this section.

It is a Class C misdemeanor for any person or entity to file a disclosure form required by this section more than thirty (30) days after the date on which the report is due.

Acts 2005, ch. 102, § 1; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 28; 2017, ch. 94, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commissioners of the Tennessee public utility commission” for “directors of the Tennessee regulatory authority” in the introductory language of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Offense of perjury, penalties, title 39, chapter 16, part 7.

Records open to public inspection, §10-7-503.

2-10-126. Disclosure of fees, commissions or any other form of compensation for consulting services to the Tennessee ethics commission.

Any staff person or employee of the general assembly; member of a commission established by and responsible to the general assembly or either house of the general assembly; member or employee of a state regulatory commission, including, without limitation, commissioners of the Tennessee public utility commission; or member or employee of any executive department or agency or other state body in the executive branch, who contracts to receive a fee, commission or any other form of compensation for consulting services from a person or entity other than the state, a county or municipality, shall be required to make the same disclosure required by § 2-10-125. The Tennessee ethics commission may devise a new form for disclosure of consulting fees or may modify the one required by § 2-10-125 for use by all parties required to disclose.

All disclosures made to the commission pursuant to this section are public records and open for inspection during regular business hours.

The disclosure shall be on a form designed by the Tennessee ethics commission, shall be made under oath, and shall contain a statement that a false statement on the report is subject to the penalties of perjury. A disclosure form shall be filed within five (5) days of entering any contract for consulting services. Such form shall be updated quarterly. The dates for filing the quarterly reports shall be determined by the Tennessee ethics commission.

It is a Class C misdemeanor for any person or entity to knowingly fail to file a disclosure form required by this section.

It is a Class C misdemeanor for any person or entity to file a disclosure form required by this section more than thirty (30) days after the date on which the report is due.

Acts 2005, ch. 102, § 1; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 28; 2017, ch. 94, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commissioners of the Tennessee public utility commission” for “directors of the Tennessee regulatory authority” in first sentence of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Offense of perjury, penalties, title 39, chapter 16, part 7.

Records open to public inspection, §10-7-503.

2-10-127. Reports by members of the general assembly, members-elect of the general assembly, governor, members of the governor's staff, secretary of state, treasurer, or comptroller of the treasury regarding siblings, spouses or children who are lobbyists.

Any person subject to the prohibition in § 2-10-123(a), whose sibling, spouse or child is required to register as a lobbyist under § 3-6-302, shall report in writing, on a form developed by the Tennessee ethics commission:

The name of the person making the disclosure and such person's business address;

The name and business address of the sibling, spouse or child;

The position of the sibling, spouse or child; and

The name and address of each person for whom the sibling, spouse or child registers for the purpose of lobbying.

The report shall be filed with the commission annually no later than February 1.

Each person subject to the prohibition in § 2-10-123(a) shall file a supplementary report with the Tennessee ethics commission that includes a complete description of any information that has changed from the information supplied in the last registration form or last report. Such supplementary reports shall be filed within ten (10) days of any such change.

A person subject to the prohibition in § 2-10-123(a) shall declare before taking a legislative or administrative action on any matter: “It may be considered that I have a degree of personal interest in the subject matter of this bill or action, but I declare that my argument and my ultimate vote answer only to my conscience and to my obligation to my constituents and the citizens of the state of Tennessee,” if:

The person is employed by a business entity that employs a lobbyist, and such lobbyist is employed by the business entity to lobby such legislative or administrative action; or

The matter is lobbied by a sibling, spouse or child of the person subject to the prohibition in § 2-10-123(a).

The person may alternatively state that the person is declaring a potential conflict of interest, in accordance with this section, or indicate the conflict via the voting board in the chamber of the house of representatives or the senate.

The report shall be made under oath and shall contain a statement that a false statement on the report is subject to the penalties of perjury.

All disclosures made to the commission pursuant to this section are public records and open for inspection during regular business hours.

Failure to file a report required by this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 2005, ch. 102, § 1; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, §§ 28, 30, 31.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Offense of perjury, penalties, title 39, chapter 16, part 7.

Records open to public inspection, §10-7-503.

2-10-128. Disclosures required of members of the general assembly.

Each member of the general assembly and the member's spouse shall annually report in writing to the Tennessee ethics commission, prior to April 15, the following information for the prior calendar year:

The major source or sources of private income of more than two hundred dollars ($200), including, but not limited to, offices, directorships, and salaried employments of the person making disclosure, and such person's spouse, but no dollar amounts need be stated. The disclosure shall state the name and address of any entity that provides a source of private income of more than two hundred dollars ($200). This subdivision (a)(1) shall not be construed to require the disclosure of any client list or customer list, nor the address of any investment property. When reporting private income received from a security listed on the New York Stock Exchange, American Stock Exchange or the Nasdaq, the disclosure may state only the name of the entity, in lieu of disclosing the name and address of the entity. If a member or spouse's ownership of a business enterprise's securities provides income of more than two hundred dollars ($200), then the business enterprise shall be named in lieu of any investment brokerage firm or other fiduciary that may possess or manage the securities on behalf of the member or spouse. If a member or spouse's ownership of shares of a mutual fund provides income of more than two hundred dollars ($200), then the mutual fund shall be named in lieu of the business enterprises whose securities are owned by the mutual fund. For purposes of this subdivision (a)(1), income shall be reported for the calendar year in which it is received. When reporting private income received from investments with a federal or state chartered bank, the disclosure may state only the name of the bank, in lieu of stating the name and address of the bank;

Any positions held during the applicable reporting period, including, but not limited to, those of an officer, director, trustee, general partner, proprietor, or representative of any corporation, firm, partnership, or other business enterprise, or any non-profit organization or educational institution. Both the year and month must be reported for the period of time the position was held. Positions with the federal government, religious, social, fraternal, or political entities, and those solely of an honorary nature do not require disclosure; and

Any trust considered to be a “blind trust” pursuant to § 35-50-120 to which a member or the member's spouse is an interested party. The person making disclosure shall state that the person is an interested party to a blind trust and provide the name and address of the trustee of the trust. Notwithstanding any provisions of this subdivision (a)(3) to the contrary, the person making disclosure is not required to disclose any individual asset held in a blind trust.

The reports in subsection (a) shall be posted on the web site of the Tennessee ethics commission. The Tennessee ethics commission shall modify existing forms to accomplish the purposes of this section.

The commission shall create a consolidated form that provides for the disclosure of the information required to be reported by this section and § 8-50-502. Any person who is required to disclose information pursuant to this section and § 8-50-501 who files the consolidated form in a manner that complies with the requirements of those sections shall fulfill the requirements of this section and § 8-50-501. Filing the consolidated form prior to April 15 as required by this section shall also fulfill the requirements of §§ 8-50-503 and 8-50-504.

Acts 2005, ch. 102, § 1; 2005, ch. 476, § 2; 2005, ch. 486, §§ 2, 3; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, §§ 28, 32.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was amended by two acts in 2005, first by ch. 476, § 2, effective June 20, 2005, then by ch. 486, §§ 2 and 3, effective July 2, 2005, neither of the acts referring to the other. The section as set out above reflects the amendments by ch. 486. Acts 2005, ch. 476 purported to amend this section with provisions that are identical to those made by ch. 486, § 2, but with an effective date that predates the effective date of the section and was given no effect.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that act is, and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Attorney General Opinions. Service on the board of the Tellico Reservoir Development Agency by a state representative, OAG 07-036 (3/26/07).

2-10-129. Disclosure of fees paid to a member of the general assembly or the member's spouse for services performed outside of the state.

If any person or other entity that contracts with the state of Tennessee, pays more than a two hundred dollar ($200) fee, commission or other form of compensation, to a member of the general assembly or a member's spouse, for consulting services on contracts to which the state of Tennessee is not a party, and for which such consulting services are to be rendered outside the state of Tennessee, then such person or entity shall disclose the following to the Tennessee ethics commission:

The name and address of the person or entity paying the fee, commission or other form of compensation;

The person to whom the fee, commission or other form of compensation was paid, including the amount paid;

The position of the person to whom the fee, commission or other form of compensation was paid;

The date the services were rendered; and

A general description of the services rendered.

As used in this subsection (a), “consulting services” means services performed outside the state of Tennessee, which would be defined as “influencing legislative or administrative action”, in § 3-6-301, if such services were performed in the state of Tennessee. “Consulting services” also includes services to advise or assist a person or entity in maintaining, applying for, soliciting or entering into a contract with a state other than the state of Tennessee.

The disclosure shall be on a form designed by the Tennessee ethics commission, shall be made under oath, and shall contain a statement that a false statement on the report is subject to the penalties of perjury. A disclosure form shall be filed within five (5) days of entering into a contract not involving the state of Tennessee with a member of the general assembly. Such form shall be updated annually, no later than February 1, if necessary.

All disclosures made to the commission pursuant to this section are public records, and are open for inspection during regular business hours.

It is a Class C misdemeanor for any person or entity to knowingly fail to file a disclosure form as required by this section.

It is a Class C misdemeanor for any person or entity to file a disclosure form required by this section more than thirty (30) days after the date on which the report is due.

Acts 2005, ch. 476, § 3; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 28.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Offense of perjury, penalties, title 39, chapter 16, part 7.

Records open to public inspection, §10-7-503.

2-10-130. Disclosure of fees, commissions or other compensation for consulting services paid to the governor, secretary of state, comptroller of the treasury, treasurer, governor's cabinet, cabinet level staff, or their spouses.

If any person or other entity that contracts with the state of Tennessee, pays more than a two hundred dollar ($200) fee, commission or other form of compensation, to the governor, secretary of state, comptroller of the treasury, treasurer, any member of the governor's cabinet, any cabinet level staff, or such persons' spouses, for consulting services on contracts to which the state of Tennessee is not a party, and for which consulting services are to be rendered outside the state of Tennessee, then the person or entity shall disclose the following to the Tennessee ethics commission:

The name and address of the person or entity paying the fee, commission or other form of compensation;

The person to whom the fee, commission or other form of compensation was paid, including the amount paid;

The position of the person to whom the fee, commission or other form of compensation was paid;

The date the services were rendered; and

A general description of the services rendered.

As used in this section, “consulting services” means services performed outside the state of Tennessee that would be defined as influencing legislative or administrative action, in § 3-6-301, if those services were performed in the state of Tennessee. “Consulting services” also includes services to advise or assist a person or entity in maintaining, applying for, soliciting or entering into a contract with a state other than the state of Tennessee.

The disclosure shall be on a form designed by the Tennessee ethics commission, shall be made under oath, and shall contain a statement that a false statement on the report is subject to the penalties of perjury. A disclosure form shall be filed within five (5) days of entering into a contract not involving the state of Tennessee with persons subject to subsection (a). The form shall be updated annually, no later than February 1, if necessary.

All disclosures made to the commission pursuant to this section are public records, and are open for inspection during regular business hours.

It is a Class C misdemeanor for any person or entity to knowingly fail to file a disclosure form as required by this section.

It is a Class C misdemeanor for any person or entity to file a disclosure form required by this section more than thirty (30) days after the date on which the report is due.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 34.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Offense of perjury, penalties, title 39, chapter 16, part 7.

Records open to public inspection, §10-7-503.

2-10-131. Investment of campaign funds.

All campaign funds must be deposited into and maintained in a financial institution insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or the national credit union administration duly authorized to do business in Tennessee and operating under the authority of the department of financial institutions, the United States comptroller of the currency, or the federal reserve board.

Any interest, dividends, or income earned by an investment made pursuant to subsection (a) must be reported on the candidate's or political campaign committee's financial disclosure report.

Any campaign contribution received in a non-monetary form may be held in the form received until the contribution is used to pay expenditures. The funds must be deposited in accordance with subsection (a) at the time of conversion.

Any investment not authorized by subsection (a) is prohibited and the candidate, or in the case of a multicandidate political campaign committee, the treasurer, shall be subject to a civil penalty by the registry of election finance. The registry of election finance may impose a maximum civil penalty for a violation of this section of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the amount invested in violation of this section, whichever is greater.

Acts 2017, ch. 109, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §2-10-131 (Acts 2010, ch. 1095, § 3; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 389, § 3, effective June 1, 2011), concerned the prohibition against corporations making contributions to any candidate.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 109, § 2. July 1, 2017.

2-10-132. Designation as a political campaign committee for reporting purposes.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a corporation that uses corporate funds, moneys or credits for communications expressly advocating the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate which funds, moneys or credits are not used with the cooperation or with the prior consent of, or in consultation with, or at the request of, or suggestion of, a candidate or any agent or authorized committee of the candidate shall be considered a political campaign committee for purposes of reporting such expenditures. The corporation shall be required to file reports required by §2-10-105(c)(1) and an appointment of treasurer form.

Acts 2010, ch. 1095, § 4.

Attorney General Opinions. Corporate contributions to political action committees under Acts 2010, ch. 1095. OAG 11-7, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 7 (1/12/11).